Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 4 Rights, Privileges, and Prohibitions

38-2-270.
Relief from civil or criminal liability; immunity not exclusive security for attorney’s fees; defense by Attorney General authorized.

Members and commanders of the militia who are performing duty pursuant to this chapter shall not be liable, civilly or criminally, for any acts done by them in the performance of their duty.

When an action or proceeding of any nature is commenced in any court by any person against any member of the militia for any act done by him in his official capacity in the discharge of any duty under this chapter or an alleged omission by him to do an act which it was his duty to perform or against any person acting under the authority or order of any such member or by virtue of any warrant issued by him pursuant to law, the defendant may require the person instituting or prosecuting the action or proceeding to give security, in such amount as shall be determined by the judge of the court in which the action is pending, for the payment of attorney fees that may be awarded to the defendant therein. In default of giving such security the action or proceeding shall be dismissed. Such a defendant in whose favor a final judgment is rendered shall recover reasonable attorney’s fees from the person instituting or prosecuting the action or proceeding. The immunity provided in this Code section shall be in addition to that provided by other provisions of law and this Code section shall not be construed to limit or qualify any other immunity provided to members or commanders of the militia by any other provision of law.

In addition to the protections of subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, the Governor is authorized to direct the Attorney General to defend any civil or criminal action brought against any member of the organized militia for any act done by him in the performance of his duty while in the active service of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 78; Ga. L. 1969, p. 228, § 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 824, § 1.

38-2-271.
Change of venue for persons indicted or subjected to civil action for performance of military duty.

Any civil officer, officer, or member of the militia or any person lawfully aiding him in the performance of any military duty required under this chapter, if subjected to a criminal charge or civil action for any crime or trespass or for injury to person or property which occurred while endeavoring to perform such duty, shall have the right, and it is made the duty of the court in which the indictment, accusation, or action is pending upon the application of any person thus defending, to transfer the trial of the indictment, accusation, or action to some county other than that in which the indictment or accusation was found or the injury done. The transfer shall be made to any county that may be agreed upon by the prosecuting attorney and the defendant or his counsel in case of a criminal charge or by the parties and their counsel in case of a civil action. If a county is not thus agreed upon, the judge shall select a county as in his judgment will afford a fair and impartial jury to try the case and have it transferred accordingly.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-1404; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 24; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 79; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38.

Cross references.

Change of venue generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. II, Para. VII.

Change of venue in civil actions, §

9-10-50

et seq.

Change of venue in criminal actions, §

17-7-150

.

38-2-272.
Exemption from arrest on civil process; uniform and equipment exempt from levy and sale.

No person belonging to the organized militia of the state shall be arrested on any civil process while going to, remaining at, or returning from any place at which he may be required to attend for military duty. No part of the uniform or equipment of any officer or enlisted man of the organized militia shall be subject to levy and sale for debts.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-702; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 24; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 80.

Cross references.

Provisions regarding privilege from arrest of active duty military personnel, §

17-4-2

.

38-2-273.
Free passage through tollgates, tunnels, toll bridges, and ferries while under orders.

Any person belonging to the organized militia shall, together with the conveyance and property of the state or of the United States in his charge, be allowed to pass free through all tollgates and tunnels and over all toll bridges and ferries if he is in uniform and presents an order for duty or certificate of an order for duty.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 81.

38-2-274.
Unlawful conversion of military property; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to secrete, sell, dispose of, offer for sale, purchase, retain after demand by a commissioned officer of the organized militia, or in any manner pawn or pledge any arms, uniforms, equipment, or other military property issued under this chapter.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

No judge, district attorney, solicitor-general, sheriff, court clerk, or other peace officer shall require the payment of any fees, court costs, or charges of any nature for any warrant obtained by the prosecutor for the unlawful conversion of military property.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-1105, 86-9904; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 52; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 82, 107; Ga. L. 1980, p. 589, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 19.

Cross references.

Theft by conversion generally, §

16-8-4

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 27, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an Act approved February 11, 1854 (Ga. L. 1854, p. 281), which abolished the office of solicitor of the City Court of Savannah, now the State Court of Chatham County, and transferred responsibility for the prosecution of criminal cases in said court to the solicitor general (now the district attorney) for the Eastern Judicial Circuit is confirmed. It shall be the duty of said district attorney to prosecute all criminal actions in said state court until otherwise specifically provided by law.”

Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 28, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The provisions of this Act shall not affect the powers, duties, or responsibilities of the district attorney as successor to the office of solicitor general under the constitution, statutes, and common law of this state as provided by Code Section 15-18-1.”

Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 29, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Except as otherwise authorized in this Act, on and after July 1, 1996, any reference in general law or in any local Act to the solicitor of a state court shall mean and shall be deemed to mean the solicitor-general of such state court.”

Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 30, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The provisions of paragraph (3) of Code Section 15-18-62, relating to the qualifications for the office of solicitor-general of a state court, shall apply to any person elected or appointed to such office after July 1, 1996. Any person holding such office on July 1, 1996, may continue to hold such office for the remainder of the term to which such person was elected or appointed notwithstanding the fact that such person has not been a member of the State Bar of Georgia for three years if such person is otherwise qualified to hold the office of solicitor-general.”

38-2-275.
Unlawful wearing of uniforms and devices indicating rank; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person except members of components of the armed forces of the United States, members of the organized militia of this or any other state, members of associations wholly composed of persons honorably discharged from the armed forces of the United States, and members of associations wholly composed of children of veterans of any war of the United States to wear any uniform or any device, strap, knot, or insignia of any design or character used as a designation of grade, rank, or office such as are by law or by regulation, duly promulgated, prescribed for the use of the organized militia or similar thereto, provided that this Code section shall not apply to cadets of military schools, the Boy Scouts of America, or to persons wearing on the stage any such uniform at theatrical or like performances.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-9902; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 50; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 82, 108.

Cross references.

Impersonation of public officers or employees generally, §

16-10-23

.

38-2-276.
Exemptions from jury duty and street tax.

Officers and enlisted personnel of the organized militia shall be exempt from street tax and, while serving on ordered active duty, from jury duty, any local or special laws to the contrary notwithstanding. The commanding officer of each or any force of the organized militia shall furnish each member of his command applying for the same such certificate of membership as may be prescribed by the adjutant general, signed by the commanding officer, which certificate shall be accepted by any court as proof of exemption as provided by this Code section. The certificate shall be good only for 30 days after which it bears date.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-701; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 24; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 83.

Cross references.

Exemptions from jury duty generally, §

15-12-1.1

.

Authority to levy and collect street tax, §

48-13-3

.

38-2-277.
Unauthorized military bodies prohibited; exceptions; support by counties or cities prohibited; penalty for membership.

No body of men other than the organized militia, components of the armed forces of the United States, and bodies of the police and state constabulary and such other organizations as may be formed under this chapter shall associate themselves together as a military unit or parade or demonstrate in public with firearms.

Associations wholly comprised of military personnel honorably discharged from the service of the United States and benevolent and secret organizations may parade in public with swords. Students in educational institutions where military science is a prescribed part of the course of instruction may drill or parade with firearms in public under the supervision of their instructors. This Code section shall not be construed to prevent parades in public with firearms by authorized organizations of the organized militia of any other state.

No political subdivision of this state shall raise or appropriate any money toward arming, equipping, uniforming, or in any other way supporting, sustaining, or providing drill rooms or armories for any such unauthorized organizations.

Any person who actively participates in an unauthorized military organization or who parades with any unauthorized body of men as set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 2; Code 1933, § 86-9901; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 49; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 84, 109.

38-2-278.
Devises, bequests, and conveyances to military units as societies; officers as trustees; effect of disbandment of unit.

Every unit of the organized militia is and shall be deemed to be a society within the meaning of Code Section 14-5-49, and Code Sections 14-5-46 through 14-5-48 shall apply to such society; provided, however, the commissioned officer or officers of the unit shall constitute the trustee or trustees of such society; and provided, further, should any unit have assigned more than three commissioned officers, the senior three shall constitute the trustees of the society. The name or names of the trustee or trustees shall be certified under the hand of the commanding officer of the unit and the certificate shall be recorded in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county wherein lies any property held in trust by the trustee or trustees. Any vacancy which may happen in the trust shall be filled by the officer appointed to fill the vacancy in the unit. When any such vacancy shall be filled, the same shall be certified under the hand of the commanding officer of the unit, which certificate shall state the name of the officer to fill the vacancy and the name of the officer whom he succeeds unless the officer fills an original vacancy in the unit; and the certificate shall be recorded in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county wherein lies property held in trust by the trustees. Any such society referred to in this Code section may take and hold by devise or bequest the title to real and personal property for its uses and purposes as a military organization in addition to its right and power to take the same by deed of conveyance and, subject to the uses and purposes contained in the deed of conveyance or devise or bequest, may mortgage, sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of the same. Should any such unit be deactivated, disbanded, moved from the locality where it acquired the title to the property, called or ordered into the active service of the United States, or by orders of competent authority cease to function as a unit of the organized militia, the title to any such property held by the unit shall vest in trust in the adjutant general, or other officer nearest corresponding to the adjutant general should that office not be in existence, to be conveyed by him to the trustees of some other unit of the organized militia nearest like the predecessor unit, as determined by him, in trust for military purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 85; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38.

38-2-279.
Rights of public officers and employees absent on military duty as members of organized militia or reserve forces.

Definitions. As used in this Code section, the term:

“Ordered military duty” means any military duty performed in the service of the state or of the United States including but not limited to attendance at any service school or schools conducted by the armed forces of the United States by a public officer or employee as a voluntary member of the National Guard or of any reserve force or reserve component of the armed forces of the United States pursuant to orders issued by competent state and federal authority.

“Public officer or employee” means every person, by whatever title, description, or designation known, who receives any pay, salary, or compensation of any kind from the state, a county, municipal corporation, or any other political subdivision or who is in any department of the state, but shall not include persons employed by the state, a county, municipal corporation, or any other political subdivision on a temporary basis.

Every public officer or employee shall be entitled to absent himself or herself and shall be deemed to have a leave of absence from duties or service as a public officer or employee while engaged in the performance of ordered military duty and while going to and returning from such duty. Notwithstanding Code Section 45-5-1 or any other provision of law, a public office shall not be considered vacated or abandoned by a public officer while on ordered military duty.

Leave of absence while attending service schools. Every public officer or employee who is or becomes a voluntary member of any force of the organized militia or of any reserve force or reserve component of the armed forces of the United States shall be entitled to absent himself or herself and shall be deemed to have a leave of absence from duties or service as a public officer or employee while in attendance as a member of such force or reserve component at any service school or schools conducted by the armed forces of the United States for a period or periods up to and including six months and while going to and returning from the school or schools, notwithstanding that orders for such attendance are or may be issued with the consent of the public officer or employee. However, no public officer or employee shall be entitled to absent himself or herself in excess of a total of six months during any four-year period.

Employment rights. Time during which a public officer or employee is absent pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section shall not constitute an interruption of continuous employment and, notwithstanding any general, special, or local law or any city charter, no such officer or employee shall be subjected directly or indirectly to any loss or diminution of time, service, increment, vacation, holiday privileges, or any other right or privilege by reason of such absence or be prejudiced with reference to continuance in office or employment, reappointment to office, reemployment, reinstatement, transfer, or promotion by reason of such absence.

Every public officer or employee shall be paid his or her salary or other compensation as such public officer or employee for any and all periods of absence while engaged in the performance of ordered military duty and while going to and returning from such duty, not exceeding a total of 18 days in any one federal fiscal year. In the event the Governor declares an emergency and orders any public officer or employee to ordered military duty as a member of the National Guard, any such officer or employee, while performing such duty, shall be paid his or her salary or other compensation as a public officer or employee for a period not exceeding 30 days in any one federal fiscal year.

(e.1) (1)

On and after July 1, 2002, every public officer or employee may be paid by the government employer the difference between his or her government salary and his or her military salary for any or all periods of absence while engaged in the performance of ordered military duty and while going to and returning from such duty, after expiration of the payment period provided for in subsection (e) of this Code section.

Rights and contributions under retirement systems.

The amount of required contributions to any pension or retirement system of which a public officer or employee, absent while engaged in the performance of ordered military duty, is a member shall be deducted from the salary or other compensation paid to such public officer or employee as a public officer or employee as provided in this Code section. If the required contributions exceed the amount of such salary or other compensation to which a public officer or employee is entitled while engaged in the performance of military duty, the amount of the salary or other compensation shall be applied upon the required contributions; and the public officer or employee shall have the right to pay to the pension or retirement system the amount by which the contributions exceed the salary or other compensation. The public officer or employee shall also have the right to pay to the system, for any period of such absence during which he or she shall receive no salary or other compensation as a public officer or employee, the amount that he or she would have contributed to the system if he or she had been present and continuously engaged in the performance of the duties of his or her position during such period.

Payments made pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, other than those deducted from his or her salary or other compensation as an officer or employee, may be paid from time to time at any time while engaged in ordered military duty or within five years after the date of termination of the ordered military duty or, in the event of the death of the public officer or employee while engaged in ordered military duty, the payments or any part thereof may be made by the named beneficiary or the legal representative of the public officer’s or employee’s estate within one year following proof of such death.

To the extent that contributions made pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection are paid, the period of absence while engaged in the performance of ordered military duty shall be counted in determining the length of total service under the pension or retirement system.

While engaged in the performance of ordered military duty, any such public officer or employee or his or her beneficiary, as the case may be, shall be entitled to all the benefits of the pension or retirement system of which such public officer or employee is a member, except accidental disability retirement and accidental death benefit.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 50, an agency, as defined by subsection (a) of Code Section 50-14-1, shall be authorized to conduct meetings by telecommunications conference in the event that one or more of the agency’s members is on ordered military duty at the time of such meeting, provided that any such meeting is conducted in compliance with such chapter. The members of the agency, including those on ordered military duty, shall be authorized to participate and make decisions during such a telecommunications conference.

Exception as to draftees, etc. This Code section shall not apply to:

Any public officer or employee who was or is involuntarily transferred, assigned, drafted, or inducted to or into any of the forces of the organized militia or any of the reserve forces or reserve components of the armed forces of the United States; or

Any public officer or employee who was or is inducted into the armed forces of the United States, but not as a member of any force of the organized militia or of any reserve force or reserve component of the armed forces of the United States.

(2)

To the extent that funds are appropriated or otherwise made available to the Department of Community Affairs for such purpose, the department may provide grants to counties, municipal corporations, and other political subdivisions to reimburse them for their costs incurred under paragraph (1) of this subsection. The department shall provide by rule for the administration of such grant program; and such rules shall provide for pro rata distribution in the event that the funds available are insufficient to reimburse all such costs.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 86; Ga. L. 1959, p. 114, § 7; Ga. L. 1979, p. 623, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1299, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1538, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 38; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1152, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1159, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1160, §§ 2, 3.

Cross references.

Qualifying in absentia for magistrates serving on active duty, §

15-10-20.1

.

Effect of service in armed forces of United States during World War II on retirement benefits under county and municipal retirement systems, §

47-1-6

.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1159, § 1, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1160, § 3. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Law reviews.

For article, “Protecting America’s Reservists, Application of State and Federal Law to Reservists’ Claims of Unfair Labor Practices,” see 7 Ga. St. B.J. 10 (2002).

38-2-280.
Reemployment in private industry; various types of absences; injunction to compel; Attorney General’s aid.

In the case of any person who has left or leaves a position, other than a temporary position, in the employ of any employer in order to perform military service and who:

Received a certificate of completion of military service duly executed by an officer of the applicable force of the armed forces of the United States or by an officer of the applicable force of the organized militia;

Is still qualified to perform the duties of the position; and

Makes application for reemployment within 90 days after he or she is relieved from such service, if the position was in the employ of a private employer,

the employer shall restore the person to the position or to a position of like seniority, status, and pay unless the employer’s circumstances have so changed as to make it impossible or unreasonable to do so.

The benefits, rights, and privileges granted to persons in the military service by this Code section shall be extended to and be applicable to any person who, in order to participate in assemblies or annual training pursuant to Code Section 38-2-25 or in order to attend service schools conducted by the armed forces of the United States for a period or periods up to and including six months, temporarily leaves or has left his or her position, other than a temporary position, in the employ of any employer and who, being qualified to perform the duties of the position, makes application for reemployment within ten days after completion of the temporary period of service; provided, however, that no such person shall be entitled to the benefits, rights, and privileges for the attendance at any service school or schools exceeding a total of six months during any four-year period.

The benefits, rights, and privileges granted to persons in the military service by this Code section shall be extended to and be applicable to any person who is or becomes a member of the organized militia or of a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States and who because of such membership is discharged by his or her employer or whose employment is suspended by his or her employer because of such membership and who, being qualified to perform the duties of the position, makes application for reemployment or termination of the period of his or her suspension within ten days after such discharge or suspension. In the event that the member of the organized militia or reserve component is serving on military duty at the time of receipt of notice of the discharge or suspension the aforesaid ten-day period within which application must be made shall not commence to run until the day next following the date of termination of such military duty.

The benefits, rights, and privileges granted to persons in the military service by this Code section shall be extended to and be applicable to any person who is a member of the Georgia National Guard and who is called into active state service by the commander-in-chief of such force for a purpose identified in subsection (a) or (b) of Code Section 38-2-6 or Code Section 38-2-6.1 or who has been called to state sponsored active duty as part of the National Guard of another state by that state’s Governor, and who because of such active state service is discharged by his or her employer or whose employment is suspended by his or her employer because of such active state service and who, being qualified to perform the duties of the position, makes application for reemployment or termination of the period of his or her suspension within ten days after such discharge or suspension. In the event that the member of the Georgia National Guard or a member of any other reserve component of the armed forces of the United States is serving in active state service at the time of receipt of notice of the discharge or suspension the aforesaid ten-day period within which application must be made shall not commence to run until the day next following the date of termination of such active state service.

Any person who is restored to a position in accordance with this Code section shall be considered as having been on furlough, on leave of absence during his or her period of military service, performing temporary service under subsection (b), or discharged or suspended under subsection (c) or (d) of this Code section, shall be restored without loss of seniority, shall be entitled to participate in insurance or other benefits offered by the employer pursuant to established rules and practices relating to employees on furlough or leave of absence in effect with the employer at the time the person entered the military service or commenced the temporary service or was so discharged or suspended, and shall not be discharged from the position without cause within one year after the restoration.

If any private employer fails or refuses to comply with this Code section, the superior court of the county in which the private employer resides shall have the power, upon petition by the person entitled to the benefits of this Code section, to require specifically the employer, by injunction, mandatory or otherwise, to comply with this Code section, and may, as an incident thereto, compensate the person for any loss of wages or benefits suffered by reason of the employer’s unlawful action. The court shall order a speedy hearing in any such case and may specially set it on the calendar. Any person claiming to be entitled to the benefits of this Code section may appear by his or her own counsel or, upon application to the Attorney General of the state, may request that the Attorney General appear and act on his or her behalf. If the Attorney General is reasonably satisfied that the person so applying is entitled to such benefits, he or she shall appear and act as attorney for the person in the amicable adjustment of the claim or in the filing of any petition and the prosecution thereof. In the hearing and determination of petitions under this Code section no fees or court costs shall be assessed against a person so applying for such benefits.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 87; Ga. L. 1959, p. 114, §§ 8, 9; Ga. L. 1995, p. 730, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 430, § 2/HB 831; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 38/HB 323.

Cross references.

Priority of service designation for veterans and spouses, § 34-14-6.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 430, § 1/HB 831, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and cited as the ‘Protecting Guardsmen’s Employment Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article, “Protecting America’s Reservists, Application of State and Federal Law to Reservists’ Claims of Unfair Labor Practices,” see 7 Ga. St. B.J. 10 (2002).

38-2-281.
Exclusion of uniformed military personnel from places of amusement; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for the owner or the owner’s agent, whatever may be the latter’s designation, of any place of amusement or recreation otherwise open to the general public, admission to which is free or otherwise, to refuse admission or exclude any officer or enlisted man of any component of the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia of this state or of any state, territory, or the District of Columbia from the place of amusement or recreation by reason of such officer’s or enlisted man’s being in uniform. Any owner or agent aforesaid who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-9911; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 59; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 118.

38-2-282.
Officers and warrant officers to administer oaths and witness documents.

Any commissioned officer or warrant officer of any force of the organized militia and any officer in the active military service of the United States is authorized to administer the oath required for the enlistment of any person, the oath required for the appointment of any person to commissioned or warrant officer grade, and any other oath required by the laws of the United States and by this chapter and by the regulations issued thereunder, in connection with the enlistment or appointment of any person in any of such forces, and to witness military documents and instruments over his official signature.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 18; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 88.

38-2-283.
Awards; individual; unit.

Every officer and enlisted man who has served this state honorably and faithfully for ten years, continuously or otherwise, and who continues in active service as an officer or enlisted man after that period shall be awarded a bronze medal of suitable design and inscription; and after each additional ten years of honorable and faithful service, continuous or otherwise, there shall be awarded, upon like continuance in service, a suitable bar. These medals and bars shall be furnished by the state through the military division upon application of the person entitled thereto, approved by intermediate commanders, and the expenses of the same shall be paid out of the military fund.

In addition to the awarding of the medals and bars provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the adjutant general is authorized to award distinctive service medals to officers and enlisted men and honorably discharged officers and enlisted men of the organized militia for meritorious services performed by the officers and enlisted men under the following provisions:

The design and inscription on the medals shall be determined by the adjutant general;

Not more than five medals shall be awarded in one calendar year;

Two medals shall be awarded at the discretion of the adjutant general for meritorious service performed by any officer or enlisted man;

Three medals shall be awarded by the adjutant general annually upon the recommendation of a board of five officers. The five officers are to be appointed each year for the purpose of selecting the three members of the organized militia who have performed the most meritorious services during the calendar year;

The adjutant general shall be authorized to make such rules and regulations as he may deem advisable with reference to convening the board provided for in paragraph (4) of this subsection and the evidence as to meritorious services to be considered by the board; and

The expense of the medals shall be paid from the military fund.

On the recommendation of the adjutant general, the Governor may authorize the award of trophies, citations, and other types of awards to members and units of the organized militia for outstanding achievements as he deems advisable to inspire the spirit of competition and to stimulate interest to the end that technical proficiency and a high standard of efficiency in administration and training are attained. The expense of the awards shall be paid from the military fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-1407; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 24; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 89.

38-2-284.
Applicability of part to residents who are personnel of the National Guard of other states.

Any other
provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the provisions of this part shall apply to residents of this state who are personnel of the Army National Guard or Air National Guard of any other state.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-284

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1774, § 1.